Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.72.040

False swearing.

(1) A person is guilty of false swearing if he or she makes a false statement, which he or she knows to be false, under an oath required or authorized by law.

(2) False swearing is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 392; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.72.040.]